Washington statutes.
RCW 15.61.030

Injunctions.

The director of agriculture may bring an action to enjoin the violation of any provision of this chapter or rule adopted pursuant to said sections in the county where such violation has occurred, notwithstanding the existence of any other remedies at law.

[ 1963 c 232 s 12.]